test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_njuoras_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# â stems


  Adjective - njuorâs: # â-stems NJUORAS
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Nom: njuorâs
    njuorâs+A+Attr: njuorâs
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Gen: njuorrâs
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Acc: njuorrâs
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Ill: njuorâsân
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Loc: njuorâsist
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Com: njuorâsáin
    njuorâs+A+Sg+Abe: njuorrâsttáá
    njuorâs+A+Ess: njuorâsin
    njuorâs+A+Par: njuorâsid
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Nom: njuorâseh
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Gen: njuorâsij
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Acc: njuorâsijd
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Ill: njuorâsáid
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Loc: njuorâsijn
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Com: [njuorâsijguin, njuorâsijgijn]
    njuorâs+A+Pl+Abe: njuorâsijttáá

    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: njuorâsub
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: njuorâsub
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: njuorâsub
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: njuorâsuubon
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: njuorâsubboost
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: njuorâsubboin
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: njuorâsubttáá
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: njuorâsuboh
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: njuorâsuboi
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: njuorâsuboid
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: njuorâsubboid
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: njuorâsuboin
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [njuorâsuboiguin, njuorâsuboigijn]
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: njuorâsuboittáá
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: njuorâsubbon
    njuorâs+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: njuorâsubbod

    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: njuorâsumos
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: njuorâsumos
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: njuorâsumos
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: njuorâsumosân
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: njuorâsumosist
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: njuorâsumosáin
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: njuorâsumosttáá
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: njuorâsumoseh
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: njuorâsumosij
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: njuorâsumosijd
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: njuorâsumosáid
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: njuorâsumosijn
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [njuorâsumosijguin, njuorâsumosijgijn]
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: njuorâsumosijttáá
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: njuorâsumosin
    njuorâs+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: njuorâsumosid
